Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB470.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1550 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1550. Firefighter and Emergency Service Training.--(a) [Beginning with the 2003-2004 school year and each school year thereafter, a school district] A school entity or nonpublic school may offer firefighter and emergency service training as credit-earning courses to students of the age of sixteen (16) years or older, except as otherwise provided in subsection (c). Such courses may include:1234567891011121314151617181920 (1) Training as a Firefighter I from the National Board on Fire Service Professional Qualifications.(2) Training as an emergency medical technician pursuant to the act of July 3, 1985 (P.L.164, No.45), known as the "Emergency Medical Services Act."(b) A school [district] entity or nonpublic school that offers firefighter and emergency service training as credit-earning courses shall provide transportation to and supervision during any firefighter and emergency service training program that takes place off school grounds. Supervision of training shall be conducted as a cooperative education program in accordance with the provisions of 22 Pa. Code § 11.28 (relating to out-of-school programs and part-time employment).(c) The Secondary Education Fire Training Pilot Program is established. The purpose of the pilot program is to provide high school students with instruction through a partnership between institutions of higher education and school entities or nonpublic schools , or both, to increase the number of individuals capable of becoming volunteer firefighters. The pilot program shall be implemented in accordance with section 7 of the act of October 24, 2012 (P.L.1209, No.151), known as the Child Labor Act, and the following:(1) The State Fire Commissioner shall accept proposals from institutions of higher education in this Commonwealth for the pilot program. From the proposals submitted, the State Fire Commissioner shall select three institutions of higher education to offer the pilot program. The State Fire Commissioner, to the greatest extent practicable, shall select one institution of higher education each from the eastern, central and western regions of this Commonwealth. Nothing in this section shall 20250SB0470PN0424 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prohibit an institution of higher education from incorporating emergency medical services instruction in the pilot program.(2) An institution of higher education selected by the State Fire Commissioner shall operate the pilot program by entering into an agreement with a school entity or nonpublic school , or both, for the provision of fire instruction to students who are in at least the ninth grade and leading to Firefighter I certification.(3) The Fire Training Fund is established in the State Treasury. The State Fire Commissioner may accept monetary donations and other money for deposit into the Fire Training Fund from a person, business, foundation, tax-exempt organization under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.) or government entity on behalf of the Commonwealth.(4) Any money appropriated, donated or transferred to and interest earned on the Fire Training Fund shall be deposited into the Fire Training Fund.(5) Money may be appropriated to the State Fire Commissioner to carry out the provisions of this subsection. Each institution of higher education offering the pilot program shall receive at least one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for the duration of the pilot program.(6) During the pilot program, the Legislative Budget and Finance Committee shall conduct a survey of volunteer fire companies in the municipalities surrounding the school entities and nonpublic schools that participate in the pilot program to determine whether the pilot program is increasing the number of volunteer firefighters and any additional recommendations. The results of the survey shall be submitted to the chair and 20250SB0470PN0424 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 minority chair of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives within six (6) months of the expiration of the pilot program.(7) The pilot program shall expire four (4) years from the effective date of this paragraph.(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Institution of higher education." A community college operating under Article XIX-A, a college operating under Article XIX-G or a university within the State System of Higher Education."Nonpublic school." A nonprofit school, other than a public school in this Commonwealth, wherein a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school attendance requirements of this act and which meets the applicable requirements of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352, 42 U.S.C. § 2000 et seq.)."Pilot program." The Secondary Education Fire Training Pilot Program established under subsection (c)."School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school.Section 2. This act shall take effect January 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20250SB0470PN0424 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627